Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 7. Special Stops Required

§ 1071.
Railroad grade crossings.

An operator approaching a railroad grade crossing shall stop within 50 feet of, but not nearer than 15 feet from, the nearest rail of the railroad and may not proceed until he or she can do so safely when:

an electric or mechanical signal device gives warning of the immediate approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

a crossing gate is lowered or a flagger gives a signal of the approach or passage of a railroad train or other on-track equipment;

a railroad train or other on-track equipment approaching within 80 rods (1,320 feet) of the highway crossing emits a signal audible from that distance and the train or other on-track equipment, by reason of its speed or nearness, is an immediate hazard;

a railroad train or other on-track equipment is plainly visible and is in hazardous proximity to or is at the crossing; or

a stop sign has been erected at the crossing pursuant to section 1006 of this title.

No operator shall drive any vehicle through, around, or under any crossing gate or barrier at a railroad crossing while the gate or barrier is closed or is being opened or closed.

Nothing in this section prohibits an individual from operating a motor vehicle across the tracks of a railroad at grade while a mechanical warning signal is in operation, provided he or she first brings the vehicle to a full stop and reasonably ascertains that the tracks can be crossed safely.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1983, No. 25

, § 2;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 38.

§ 1072.
Certain vehicles must stop.

Before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad, the drivers of the following vehicles shall stop within 50 feet, but not less than 15 feet, from the nearest rail of the railroad and while so stopped shall look and listen in both directions along the track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment, and shall not proceed until he or she can do so safely:
(a) (1) Before crossing at grade any track or tracks of a railroad, the drivers of the following vehicles shall stop within 50 feet, but not less than 15 feet, from the nearest rail of the railroad and while so stopped shall look and listen in both directions along the track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment, and shall not proceed until he or she can do so safely:

any motor vehicle carrying passengers for hire except for jitneys designed to carry not more than seven passengers including the driver;

any school bus or multifunction school activity bus; and

any vehicle carrying explosive substances or flammable liquids as cargo or part of its cargo.

After stopping as required in this subsection and upon proceeding when it is safe to do so, the driver of any such vehicle shall cross so that there will be no necessity for changing gears while traversing the crossing, and the driver shall not shift gears while crossing the track or tracks.

No stop need be made at any crossing where an attendant, an enforcement officer, or a traffic-control signal directs traffic to proceed.

The driver of a Type I school bus stopping as required under subsection (a) of this section shall open the door of the bus before crossing the railroad tracks. Drivers of Type II school buses shall open the left front window.

Except when required by section 1071 of this title, stopping is not required at a crossing that has been signed as “exempt” in accordance with a designation of the Transportation Board.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1979, No. 39

, § 1;

1983, No. 49

, eff. April 21, 1983;

1985, No. 2

;

1985, No. 2

68 (Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1991, No. 49

, § 2, eff. June 4, 1991;

1997, No. 32

, § 2;

2015, No. 50

, § 8;

2017, No. 132

(Adj. Sess.), § 12;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 38.

§ 1073.
Heavy equipment.

No individual shall operate or move any crawler-type tractor, steam shovel, derrick, roller, or any equipment or structure having a normal operating speed of 10 miles per hour or less upon or across any tracks at a railroad grade crossing except in accordance with this section.

Before making any crossing, the individual operating or moving any such equipment shall first stop within 50 feet of, but not nearer than 15 feet from, the nearest rail of such railroad and while so stopped shall listen and look in both directions along such track for any approaching train or other on-track equipment and for signals indicating the approach of a train or other on-track equipment, and may not proceed until the crossing can be made safely.

No crossing may be made when warning is given by automatic signal, crossing gates, flagger, or otherwise of the immediate approach of a railroad train or other on-track equipment.

If a flagger is provided by the railroad, movement over the crossing shall be under the flagger’s direction.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 38;

2021, No. 20

, § 240.

§ 1074.
Vehicle entering roadway.

A driver of a vehicle emerging from an alley, private road, legal trail, class 4 town highway, class 3 town highway serving only one residence, or driveway shall stop immediately prior to driving onto a sidewalk or onto the sidewalk area extending across any alleyway or driveway, shall yield the right of way to any pedestrian as may be necessary to avoid contact, and upon entering the roadway shall yield the right of way to all vehicles approaching on the roadway.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973;

1995, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 1075.
Passing school bus.

The operator of a motor vehicle, including authorized emergency vehicles under section 1015 of this title, upon meeting or overtaking a vehicle marked and equipped as provided in section 1283 of this title that has stopped on the highway for the purpose of receiving or discharging public or private schoolchildren, shall stop his or her vehicle immediately and shall keep it stationary while the flashing red signal lights are in operation.

The driver of a vehicle need not stop upon a highway with separate roadways upon meeting or overtaking a school bus that is on a different roadway, or upon a controlled access highway where the school bus is stopped in a loading zone that is a part of or adjacent to the highway at a point where pedestrians are not permitted to cross the roadway.

HISTORY:

Added

1971, No. 258

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 1, 1973; amended

1975, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1981, No. 97

, § 3.

§ 1076.
Commercial motor vehicles; railroad crossings.

Persons operating a commercial vehicle who are not required to stop at railroad crossings shall slow to a speed sufficient to allow for a clear view of the tracks in both directions and stop before reaching the crossing if a train is approaching in either direction.

Operators of commercial and noncommercial vehicles shall:

allow sufficient space to drive completely through a railroad crossing without stopping;

obey a traffic control device or the directions of an enforcement official at the crossing;

not attempt to cross tracks if there is insufficient undercarriage clearance.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 26

, § 4.